Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.060

Chair and vice chair—Quorum—Meetings.

The commission shall elect a chair and a vice chair from among its members. Nine members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.

The commission shall meet at least quarterly. Additional meetings may be called by the chair and shall be called by the chair upon the written request of six members.

[ 2021 c 323 s 5; 1999 c 97 s 2; 1974 ex.s. c 94 s 6.]